Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 5. Building Fund and Reserve Fund

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools §§ 80 to 98.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts §§ 381 to 392; 79 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts §§ 557 to 645.

§ 21-13-501.
Board of trustees of any school district authorized to hold election; building or repayment fund generally.

The board of trustees of any school district may, whenever a majority thereof so decide, submit to the electors of the district the question whether the board shall be authorized to start a building fund of a certain amount, to be raised within a certain number of years, for the purpose of acquiring land, erection, enlargement, and equipping of school buildings, teacherages, garages or other such buildings as may be needed for school purposes therein, or submit the question of whether the board is authorized to direct the county treasurer to annually levy against the property of the district to pay off existing school district or school facility authority refunding bonds of a certain amount, not to exceed four percent (4%) on the assessed value of the taxable property therein as shown by the last preceding general assessment. The fund and any interest accruing thereto shall be held by the county treasurer for the purposes herein specified and shall be used for no other purpose. The fund may be voted and raised in addition to the existing bonded indebtedness of the district.

The authority for levies to pay off existing refunding bonds as specifically authorized by this section is only effective for school districts receiving voter approval on or before September 15, 1982.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 33, § 1; 1945, ch. 130, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 67-301; W.S. 1957, § 21-71; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 240; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-240; Laws 1982, ch. 8, § 1.

§ 21-13-502.
Conduct of election; levy of tax; custody and investment of funds raised.

The election in connection with the question under W.S.

21-13-501

shall be held on a date and in the manner prescribed for elections on the issuance of school bonds, except that the ballots must contain the words “building fund, yes” and “building fund, no” or “levy against the property of the district to pay off existing refunding bonds, yes” and “levy against the property of the district to pay off existing refunding bonds, no”. If the majority of the votes at the elections are “building fund, yes” or “levy against the property of the district to pay off existing refunding bonds, yes”, the clerk of the district shall immediately notify the board of county commissioners and the county treasurer, and the board of county commissioners shall thereafter levy annually the tax necessary to raise the fund in the number of years specified. The funds as raised shall be kept in the custody of the county treasurer until sufficient funds have been raised to commence the building or to commence the payoff of the existing refunding bonds contemplated by the school district. The board of trustees may require the county treasurer to invest the funds raised under this section as permitted by law and the interest accruing from the investment shall be retained in the building fund and to make payments as directed by the board of trustees.

The authority for levies to pay off existing refunding bonds as specifically authorized by this section is only effective for school districts receiving voter approval on or before September 15, 1982.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 33, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 67-302; W.S. 1957, § 21-72; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 241; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-241; Laws 1982, ch. 8, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to conduct of bond elections, see chapter 21 of title 22.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see IV Wyo. L.J. 227.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rescission of vote authorizing school district expenditure or tax, 68 ALR2d 1041.

§ 21-13-503.
Election on issuance of bonds; discontinuance of tax levy.

At any time after the raising of a building fund has been commenced by any school district, the board of school trustees may submit to the electors of the district, as provided for bond elections by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

, the question whether the board shall be authorized to issue coupon bonds of the district, but in no case shall the amount of bonds exceed the bonded indebtedness permitted by law. If the bonds are authorized, the annual building fund levy shall be discontinued by the board of county commissioners when the levy is commenced for payment of the bonds.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 33, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 67-303; W.S. 1957, § 21-73; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 242; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-242; 1996, ch. 97, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to bond issues, see article 7 of this chapter.

§ 21-13-504.
Special reserve fund.

The board of trustees of each Wyoming school district may create a special reserve fund of a specified amount, for the purpose of purchasing or replacing specified equipment or a depreciation reserve for equipment and school building repair. The board may annually include in its budget for the ensuing fiscal year, the amount so designated, as a special fund, expendable only for the purposes stated and segregated as such, from general and other special school funds, disbursements therefrom to be made from time to time by the school clerk’s warrants drawn against said special fund, as duly ordered by said board; provided, that said amount so specially budgeted for any fiscal year shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total amount budgeted for the same year; and further provided, that any difference in the amount so specially budgeted for any such year and the amount expended from said fund during such year, may be retained in and carried over as a part of the special reserve fund.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-74; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 243; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-243.